installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX A   it          ily        [^cr]it
SFX A   it          eme        zit
SFX A   it          ete        zit
SFX A   it          u          rit
SFX A   it          es         rit
SFX A   it          e          rit
SFX A   it          eme        rit
SFX A   it          ete        rit
SFX A   it          ou         rit
SFX A   it          i          rit
SFX A   it          el         rit
SFX A   it          ela        rit
SFX A   it          elo        rit
SFX A   it          eli        rit
SFX A   it          ely        rit
SFX A   it          nu         cit
SFX A   it          nes        cit
SFX A   it          ne         cit
SFX A   it          neme       cit
SFX A   it          nete       cit
SFX A   it          nou        cit
SFX A   it          ni         cit
SFX A   it          neme       cit
SFX A   it          nete       cit
SFX A   it          al         cit
SFX A   it          ala        cit
SFX A   it          alo        cit
SFX A   it          ali        cit
SFX A   it          aly        cit
SFX A   et          im         [^d]et
SFX A   et          is         [^d]et
SFX A   et          i          [^d]et
SFX A   et          ime        [^d]et
SFX A   et          ite        [^d]et
SFX A   t           j          [^dnt]et
SFX A   t           jme        [^dnt]et
SFX A   t           jte        [^dnt]et
SFX A   edet        im         edet
SFX A   edet        is         edet
SFX A   edet        i          edet
SFX A   edet        ime        edet
SFX A   edet        ite        edet
SFX A   et          i          edet
SFX A   det         z          edet
SFX A   det         zme        edet
SFX A   det         zte        edet
SFX A   t           j          adet
SFX A   t           jme        adet
SFX A   t           jte        adet
SFX A   et          im         [^e]det
SFX A   et          is         [^e]det
SFX A   et          i          [^e]det
SFX A   et          ime        [^e]det
SFX A   et          ite        [^e]det
SFX A   det         d          [^ae]det
SFX A   det         dte        [^ae]det
SFX A   det         dme        [^ae]det
SFX A   tet         t          tet
SFX A   tet         tme        tet
SFX A   tet         tte        tet
SFX A   et          i          [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]net
SFX A   et          eme        [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]net
SFX A   et          ete        [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]net
SFX A   net         n          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]net
SFX A   net         nme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]net
SFX A   net         nte        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]net
SFX A   et          i          [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]net
SFX A   et          eme        [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]net
SFX A   et          ete        [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]net
SFX A   net         n          [aeiouyaeiouyue]net
SFX A   net         nme        [aeiouyaeiouyue]net
SFX A   net         nte        [aeiouyaeiouyue]net
SFX A   et          im         et
SFX A   et          is         et
SFX A   et          i          et
SFX A   et          ime        et
SFX A   et          ite        et
SFX A   t           0          et
SFX A   et          ic         et
SFX A   et          ice        et
SFX A   et          i          [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   t           me         [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   0           e          [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   t           j          [aeiouyu][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   t           jme        [aeiouyu][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   t           jte        [aeiouyu][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   et          0          [aeiouyerl][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   et          me         [aeiouyerl][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   et          te         [aeiouyerl][^aeiouyaeiouyue]et
SFX A   t           0          et
SFX A   et          ic         et
SFX A   et          ice        et
SFX A   out         u          nout
SFX A   out         es         nout
SFX A   out         e          nout
SFX A   out         eme        nout
SFX A   out         ete        nout
SFX A   t           0          nout
SFX A   out         a          nout
SFX A   t           c          nout
SFX A   t           ce         nout
SFX A   nout        n          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        nme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        nte        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   out         i          [aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   out         eme        [aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ete        [aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        n          [aeiouyaeiouyue]nout
SFX A   nout        nme        [aeiouyaeiouyue]nout
SFX A   nout        nte        [aeiouyaeiouyue]nout
SFX A   out         i          [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   out         eme        [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   out         ete        [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   out         ul         [^aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ula        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ulo        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   out         uli        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   out         uly        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        l          [aeiouyaeiouyue]rnout
SFX A   nout        la         [aeiouyaeiouyue]rnout
SFX A   nout        lo         [aeiouyaeiouyue]rnout
SFX A   nout        li         [aeiouyaeiouyue]rnout
SFX A   nout        ly         [aeiouyaeiouyue]rnout
SFX A   nout        l          [aeiouyaeiouyuer][^aeiouyaeiouyuerl][^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   nout        l          [aeiouyaeiouyuer][^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   out         ul         [^aeiouyaeiouyue]l[^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   nout        l          l[^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   nout        la         [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   nout        lo         [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   nout        li         [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   nout        ly         [^aeiouyaeiouyuerl]nout
SFX A   out         ul         [aeiouyaeiouyuel]nout
SFX A   out         ula        [aeiouyaeiouyuel]nout
SFX A   out         ulo        [aeiouyaeiouyuel]nout
SFX A   out         uli        [aeiouyaeiouyuel]nout
SFX A   out         uly        [aeiouyaeiouyuel]nout
SFX A   0           a          n
SFX A   0           o          n
SFX A   0           i          n
SFX A   0           y          n
SFX A   0           a          yt
SFX A   0           o          yt
SFX A   0           i          yt
SFX A   0           y          yt
SFX A   0           a          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           o          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           i          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           y          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           i          [^coy]t
SFX A   t           i          ct
