installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
adsorbovat/ATN
alarmovat/ATN
anektovat/ATN
argumentovat/ATN
auditovat/ATN
balovat/ATN
bednit/ATN
blaznit/ATN
bobovat/AN
brakovat/ATN
bronzovat/ATN
bydlit/AN
cepovat/ATN
cizolozit/AN
cvockovat/ATN
cernit/ATN
cmajznout/ATN
dealokovat/ATN
degustovat/ATN
dekorovat/ATN
demontovat/ATN
derivovat/ATN
devitalizovat/ATN
disgustovat/ATN
divergovat/ATN
dobalit/ATN
dobojovat/ATN
docenit/ATN
docepyrit/ATN
dodolovat/ATN
dodusit/ACN
doglosovat/ATN
dohodit/ACN
dohryzat/AJTN
dochroupat/AJTN
dokazat/ATN
dokmitnout/AN
dokopnout/ATN
dokreslovat/ATN
dokulmovat/ATN
dolaskovat/ATN
doliznout/ATN
domaknout/AN
domirit/ATN
domyslet/AN
doopravit/ATN
doparketovat/ATN
doplatkovat/ATN
doportovat/ATN
doprosit/ATN
doradovat/AN
dorodit/AN
doricet/AN
dosidlit/ATN
doslovovat/ATN
dosouperit/ATN
dostreckovat/AN
dosvetit/ACN
doskatulkovat/ATN
dospendlit/ATN
dotapetovat/ATN
dotknout/ACTN
dotrylkovat/ATN
dovalit/ATN
dovezt/ATN
dovrtet/ATN
dozaplatovat/ATN
dozvucovat/ATN
dratkovat/ATN
drsnet/AJN
dupnout/ATN
eliminovat/ATN
evakuovat/ATN
expurgovat/ATN
fasetovat/ATN
fingovat/ATN
formatovat/ATN
fucet/AN
glajchsaltovat/ATN
hacnout/AN
harmonisovat/ATN
hierarchizovat/ATN
hmozdit/AN
honosit/AN
hryzat/AJTN
hyrit/ATN
chradnout/AN
indexovat/ATN
interferovat/AN
jehlovat/ATN
kanetovat/ATN
klapat/AJTN
klucit/ATN
kombinovat/ATN
konsekrovat/ATN
korigovat/ATN
krakovat/ATN
krehnout/AN
kupit/ATN
lahvovat/ATN
letovat/ATN
lokalizovat/ATN
mamit/ATN
memorovat/ATN
mnozit/ATN
mrznout/ATN
nabehnout/AN
nacichnout/AN
nadletnout/ATN
nafackovat/ATN
nahromadit/ATN
naklast/ATN
nakreslit/ATN
nalamentovat/AN
namalovat/ATN
naohybat/AJTN
naplazit/AN
naprahnout/ACN
narvat/AN
nasnit/ATN
nasunout/ATN
nasroubovat/ATN
natupirovat/ATN
navonet/ATN
neologizovat/ATN
obarvit/ATN
obhryzat/AJTN
oblehnout/ACN
oborovat/AN
obstrikovat/ATN
ocinovat/ATN
odblanit/ATN
oddalit/ATN
odformalizovat/ATN
odhryzat/AJTN
odklonit/ATN
odkupovat/ATN
odloudit/ATN
odmlzovat/ATN
odpecetit/ATN
odpocnout/ATN
odrecitovat/ATN
odsirit/ATN
odstrelit/ATN
odstipat/AJTN
odtucnit/ATN
odvladnout/ATN
odzenstit/ATN
ohrozovat/ATN
oklepat/AJTN
okukovat/AN
omezovat/ATN
opatrovat/ATN
opodstatnovat/ATN
optovat/ATN
osifikovat/ATN
osprchovat/ATN
oslapat/AJTN
otrit/ATN
ozdravit/ATN
padit/AN
parkovat/ATN
penit/ATN
plakat/AN
poanglictovat/ATN
podavit/ATN
podilet/AJN
podnitit/ACN
podskakovat/ATN
podvrtnout/ATN
pohrabat/ATN
pojit/ATN
pokrcovat/ATN
polezet/AN
pomlcet/AN
poohlidnout/AN
popotahovat/ATN
porucnikovat/AN
posolit/ATN
posunkovat/AN
potencovat/ATN
povarit/ATN
povzdychnout/ATN
pozidovstit/ATN
probarvovat/ATN
procistit/ACN
profouknout/ATN
prohyrit/ATN
prokonsultovat/ATN
prolamovat/ATN
promesovat/ATN
propisovat/ATN
proridnout/AN
prosrat/ATN
proskrabnout/ATN
protocit/ATN
provlhcovat/ATN
prebarvovat/ATN
preclenit/ATN
predkompilovat/ATN
predplizit/AN
predtahnout/ACN
prefotografovat/ATN
prehustit/ACN
prekolkovat/ATN
prekrizit/ATN
prelidnit/ATN
premontovat/ATN
prepisknout/ATN
prerazitkovat/ATN
presklit/ATN
prestylizovat/ATN
pretahovat/ATN
pretvaret/AJTN
prevrhnout/ACN
pribouchnout/ATN
prihlednout/AN
prikorenit/ATN
prilepsovat/ATN
prinozovat/ATN
pripodobnit/ATN
prischnout/AN
pristupovat/AN
pritezovat/ATN
privesovat/ATN
pudrovat/ATN
ramovat/ATN
registrovat/ATN
rendrovat/ATN
revitalizovat/ATN
rozbahnit/ATN
rozcerovat/ATN
rozebrat/ATXN
rozhazovat/ATN
rozjasnovat/ATN
rozkreslit/ATN
rozlitostnit/ATN
rozmluvit/ATN
rozparit/ATN
rozprasit/ATN
rozresit/ATN
rozsifrovat/ATN
roztesknovat/ATN
rozvarit/ATN
rozvrhovat/ATN
rypat/AJTN
saknout/AN
sdruzit/ATN
seradit/ACTN
sestrelit/ATN
sestouchnout/ATN
shoret/ATN
simulovat/ATN
sklicovat/ATN
skripet/AN
slisovat/ATN
smesovat/ATN
snizit/ATN
sparovat/ATN
spojovat/ATN
spoluvlastnit/ATN
srset/AN
stihnout/ACN
strhnout/ACN
subskribovat/ATN
sverit/ATN
sympatizovat/ATN
sevelit/AN
slechtit/ATN
srafovat/ATN
tabuizovat/ATN
tesarit/AN
tmelit/ATN
trefovat/AN
tribit/ATN
ubezpecovat/ATN
ucist/ATN
uhnist/AN
ujezdit/ATN
ukoulet/AJTN
ulizovat/ATN
umoznit/ATN
upichnout/ATN
uprosovat/ATN
urvat/AN
usmrcovat/ATN
ustrojit/ATN
ustipnout/ATN
utorovat/ATN
uvazit/ATN
uzemnit/ATN
varit/ATN
vepisovat/ATN
vhrabat/ATN
vkrocit/ATN
vmesovat/ATN
vpichovat/ATN
vrazovat/ATN
vtahovat/ATN
vybehnout/ATN
vybudovat/ATN
vycinovat/ATN
vydrancovat/ATN
vyfotit/ACN
vyholit/ATN
vyhvizdnout/ATN
vykazat/ATN
vykopirovat/ATN
vykricet/ATN
vyletovat/ATN
vyluxovat/ATN
vymodelovat/ATN
vyobrazovat/ATN
vyplakatovat/AN
vypomoci/AN
vyprset/ATN
vyrypnout/ATN
vyskakovat/AN
vysoutezit/ATN
vystrojovat/ATN
vysachovat/ATN
vysroubovat/ATN
vytizit/ATN
vytusovat/ATN
vyvesit/ACN
vyzbrojit/ATN
vyzrat/ATN
vzorovat/ATN
zabarvit/ATN
zaborovat/ATN
zacilit/ATN
zadekretovat/ATN
zafucet/AN
zahlubovat/ATN
zahubit/ATN
zainteresovat/ATN
zaklepat/AJTN
zakotvit/ATN
zakriknout/ATN
zalergizovat/ATN
zamacknout/ATN
zamordovat/ATN
zaobroubit/ATN
zapilovat/ATN
zapouzdrit/ATN
zarachotit/AN
zarezat/AJTN
zaslepovat/ATN
zastinit/ATN
zasantrocit/ATN
zasramotit/AN
zateplovat/ATN
zatuchnout/ATN
zavelet/ATN
zavorovat/ATN
zazmatkarit/AN
zbohatnout/AN
zcivilizovat/ATN
zdestruovat/ATN
zdrzet/ATN
zeskelnatet/AJTN
zevlovat/ATN
zhlednout/ATXN
zhudebnovat/ATN
zintensivnit/ATN
zkalkulovat/ATN
zkoncentrovat/ATN
zkracovat/ATN
zkultivovat/ATN
zlikvidovat/ATN
zmekcit/ATN
zmonitorovat/ATN
znazornit/ATN
znepruhlednit/ATN
zneverohodnit/ATN
zobat/AJTN
zosklivit/ATN
zplostovat/ATN
zpozornet/AJN
zprutocnit/ATN
zranit/ATN
zrezavet/AJTN
ztechnizovat/ATN
ztrpcovat/ATN
zuslechtit/ATN
zvetrit/ATN
zvulkanizovat/ATN
zmolkovatet/ATN
